ukrainian/test.aff
SET UTF-8

SFX A Y 1
SFX A 0 ся .

SFX B Y 1
SFX B 0 и .

SFX C Y 1
SFX C 0 м .

SFX D Y 97
SFX D м й .
SFX D й м .
SFX D ся 0 .
SFX D и 0 .
SFX D ь я .
SFX D х ми .
SFX D у а .
SFX D а у .
SFX D е і .
SFX D і е .
SFX D ою у .
SFX D го му .
SFX D ї ю .
SFX D мо те .
SFX D ш мо .
SFX D ів ами .
SFX D ло вши .
SFX D є ю .
SFX D істю ості .
SFX D ко ці .
SFX D ок ками .
SFX D вав ють .
SFX D нню тимуть .
SFX D ння тимуть .
SFX D єю ї .
SFX D но вши .
SFX D ею і .
SFX D ую ованими .
SFX D ив ять .
SFX D цю ками .
SFX D ця ками .
SFX D ик і .
SFX D ая ому .
SFX D ію ові .
SFX D ув ете .
SFX D н 0 .
SFX D тво ькими .
SFX D ія ові .
SFX D аю увавши .
SFX D юю ять .
SFX D ч нням .
SFX D лю ивши .
SFX D їв єві .
SFX D то вши .
SFX D тор цією .
SFX D ст змові .
SFX D яв еними .
SFX D яю еними .
SFX D ов у .
SFX D иня ами .
SFX D иню ами .
SFX D г зі .
SFX D хо сі .
SFX D ід одові .
SFX D ер ові .
SFX D с 0 .
SFX D тав чімо .
SFX D ук енкові .
SFX D юк і .
SFX D ір орові .
SFX D ливо нім .
SFX D тв ькими .
SFX D як і .
SFX D ово ами .
SFX D л 0 .
SFX D з тичними .
SFX D тя ь .
SFX D ар у .
SFX D ля 0 .
SFX D шав й .
SFX D ищ і .
SFX D ро 0 .
SFX D ьню ень .
SFX D ьня ень .
SFX D рю ми .
SFX D ттю ватимем .
SFX D ря ми .
SFX D 'ю нім .
SFX D ат уватиме .
SFX D кав чу .
SFX D 'я ного .
SFX D ак у .
SFX D іт оті .
SFX D дав вши .
SFX D дю ь .
SFX D ік икові .
SFX D ж м .
SFX D зав жемо .
SFX D чю 0 .
SFX D еня і .
SFX D енят ам .
SFX D до 0 .
SFX D ит і .
SFX D оїд у .
SFX D ськ 0 .
SFX D ет у .
SFX D п 0 .

SFX E Y 118
SFX E я ь .
SFX E м 0 .
SFX E х м .
SFX E ми х .
SFX E сь 0 .
SFX E у і .
SFX E і у .
SFX E е у .
SFX E а ою .
SFX E ою а .
SFX E ій ими .
SFX E ої ими .
SFX E ого ими .
SFX E ий ому .
SFX E мо 0 .
SFX E ш те .
SFX E ть 0 .
SFX E ів ах .
SFX E ли вши .
SFX E ти вши .
SFX E ло ти .
SFX E вши ла .
SFX E є й .
SFX E істю ости .
SFX E ки ці .
SFX E чи ть .
SFX E вав ємо .
SFX E ок кам .
SFX E нню тимемо .
SFX E єю ю .
SFX E ко ок .
SFX E но ти .
SFX E ею ями .
SFX E нь тимуть .
SFX E уй ованими .
SFX E ую ованого .
SFX E ей ями .
SFX E ець цеві .
SFX E ик ому .
SFX E цю кам .
SFX E ії у .
SFX E ив іть .
SFX E иць ого .
SFX E ув емо .
SFX E ію ами .
SFX E тво ького .
SFX E ай увавши .
SFX E ни 0 .
SFX E аю уватиме .
SFX E юй ять .
SFX E юю еними .
SFX E ч льними .
SFX E ин ами .
SFX E лю ите .
SFX E їв ями .
SFX E тори цією .
SFX E то ли .
SFX E тор ціє .
SFX E ст змом .
SFX E яй еними .
SFX E яв еного .
SFX E яю еного .
SFX E ги зі .
SFX E ви м .
SFX E хи сі .
SFX E ов а .
SFX E иню ові .
SFX E ер у .
SFX E ід одом .
SFX E тав чіть .
SFX E єць йцеві .
SFX E ери ові .
SFX E ук енком .
SFX E юк енкові .
SFX E ливо ними .
SFX E ір ором .
SFX E оди ід .
SFX E тв ького .
SFX E ль 0 .
SFX E ово у .
SFX E з тичного .
SFX E ін у .
SFX E як у .
SFX E шав вши .
SFX E си 0 .
SFX E рю м .
SFX E ар ові .
SFX E ищ у .
SFX E ттю ватимеш .
SFX E ат уватиму .
SFX E ан у .
SFX E 'ю ного .
SFX E он у .
SFX E 'ї ного .
SFX E ак і .
SFX E г жними .
SFX E хо 0 .
SFX E кав нувши .
SFX E іт оту .
SFX E ен ні .
SFX E л м .
SFX E с ові .
SFX E дю і .
SFX E ун ові .
SFX E зав жете .
SFX E дав сти .
SFX E ж 0 .
SFX E їн єю .
SFX E ік иком .
SFX E зи м .
SFX E ьню и .
SFX E ури і .
SFX E енят а .
SFX E ян і .
SFX E оїди у .
SFX E пи 0 .
SFX E ет і .
SFX E би 0 .

SFX F Y 143
SFX F м х .
SFX F у е .
SFX F а і .
SFX F і а .
SFX F ю ї .
SFX F е ому .
SFX F ї му .
SFX F ій ому .
SFX F их ого .
SFX F ими ому .
SFX F ий ого .
SFX F ого ім .
SFX F ах у .
SFX F ами у .
SFX F ш м .
SFX F теся мось .
SFX F мось теся .
SFX F мося теся .
SFX F тесь мось .
SFX F мо ш .
SFX F ів ам .
SFX F ться 0 .
SFX F мся ться .
SFX F ть вши .
SFX F шся ться .
SFX F ти ло .
SFX F ли ти .
SFX F вши ло .
SFX F ло ть .
SFX F є ють .
SFX F ями ю .
SFX F ях ю .
SFX F лась вшись .
SFX F лася вшись .
SFX F лись вшись .
SFX F лися вшись .
SFX F лось вшись .
SFX F лося вшись .
SFX F тись вшись .
SFX F тися вшись .
SFX F всь лась .
SFX F вся лась .
SFX F вшись лась .
SFX F вшися лась .
SFX F усь еться .
SFX F уся еться .
SFX F вав єте .
SFX F юсь ємось .
SFX F юся ємось .
SFX F йсь ється .
SFX F йся ється .
SFX F ок ках .
SFX F ючи ємо .
SFX F ння тимемо .
SFX F ки ок .
SFX F чись ться .
SFX F чися ться .
SFX F но ла .
SFX F ко 0 .
SFX F нь тимемо .
SFX F уй ованого .
SFX F ей ям .
SFX F ик ого .
SFX F ця кам .
SFX F ець цем .
SFX F ив еними .
SFX F ая ими .
SFX F иць ому .
SFX F тво ькому .
SFX F ія ами .
SFX F ай уватиме .
SFX F ув іть .
SFX F юй еними .
SFX F ч льного .
SFX F ин ам .
SFX F їв ю .
SFX F іми ьому .
SFX F іх ьому .
SFX F ни атимемо .
SFX F то ла .
SFX F тор ції .
SFX F ячи итимуть .
SFX F тори ціє .
SFX F яй еного .
SFX F яв еному .
SFX F ст змі .
SFX F ови у .
SFX F иня ові .
SFX F ов івкою .
SFX F ер і .
SFX F ід оді .
SFX F тав чуть .
SFX F єць йцями .
SFX F ери у .
SFX F нись авшись .
SFX F нися авшись .
SFX F ук енка .
SFX F ливо ного .
SFX F юк енком .
SFX F ір орі .
SFX F тв ькому .
SFX F ачи итимуть .
SFX F учи ете .
SFX F з тичному .
SFX F тя нім .
SFX F ди 0 .
SFX F ово ах .
SFX F хи 0 .
SFX F ін а .
SFX F шав йте .
SFX F як а .
SFX F зми стами .
SFX F ат ові .
SFX F ар и .
SFX F ищ а .
SFX F ря м .
SFX F 'я ному .
SFX F ги жного .
SFX F ан і .
SFX F он і .
SFX F г жного .
SFX F си шу .
SFX F ель лями .
SFX F іт отові .
SFX F кав нете .
SFX F ля ель .
SFX F л ти .
SFX F ен ну .
SFX F хо ні .
SFX F с ну .
SFX F зав жуть .
SFX F ак ові .
SFX F їн ю .
SFX F дав ла .
SFX F ік ику .
SFX F еня ам .
SFX F ж ли .
SFX F ун и .
SFX F зи 0 .
SFX F ури и .
SFX F енят і .
SFX F ух і .
SFX F ет и .

SFX G Y 1
SFX G 0 сь .

SFX H Y 167
SFX H у ою .
SFX H ім ому .
SFX H им ому .
SFX H і ими .
SFX H а ими .
SFX H ою ими .
SFX H е ого .
SFX H ї го .
SFX H ій ого .
SFX H их ому .
SFX H ими ого .
SFX H ого им .
SFX H ий ім .
SFX H ом у .
SFX H ам у .
SFX H ах и .
SFX H ами и .
SFX H теся мося .
SFX H тесь мося .
SFX H мось тесь .
SFX H мося тесь .
SFX H мо теся .
SFX H ів ові .
SFX H ш 0 .
SFX H ям ю .
SFX H ться мось .
SFX H мся теся .
SFX H шся мось .
SFX H ти ли .
SFX H вши ли .
SFX H ть ло .
SFX H ли ть .
SFX H ло в .
SFX H ем у .
SFX H єм ють .
SFX H є йте .
SFX H лась вшися .
SFX H лася вшися .
SFX H лись вшися .
SFX H лися вшися .
SFX H лось вшися .
SFX H лося вшися .
SFX H тись вшися .
SFX H тися вшися .
SFX H ях і .
SFX H ями і .
SFX H всь лася .
SFX H вся лася .
SFX H вшись лася .
SFX H вшися лася .
SFX H істю осте .
SFX H усь емось .
SFX H уся емось .
SFX H вав йте .
SFX H юсь ємося .
SFX H юся ємося .
SFX H йсь ються .
SFX H йся ються .
SFX H ючи єте .
SFX H нню тимете .
SFX H ння тимете .
SFX H ок ку .
SFX H єю я .
SFX H ючись ється .
SFX H ючися ється .
SFX H но ло .
SFX H ки 0 .
SFX H ею ю .
SFX H ко ами .
SFX H нь тимете .
SFX H уй ованому .
SFX H ую ованому .
SFX H ей ях .
SFX H цю ках .
SFX H ця ках .
SFX H ик у .
SFX H ець цями .
SFX H ив еного .
SFX H ая ого .
SFX H ію у .
SFX H иць ою .
SFX H ай уватиму .
SFX H аю уватиму .
SFX H ув імо .
SFX H тво ькій .
SFX H ія ом .
SFX H юй еного .
SFX H юю еного .
SFX H ч льному .
SFX H лю ить .
SFX H ин ах .
SFX H їв ям .
SFX H іми ього .
SFX H іх ього .
SFX H ни атимете .
SFX H зм стами .
SFX H то ло .
SFX H тор цію .
SFX H тори ції .
SFX H ячи итимемо .
SFX H яй еному .
SFX H яю еному .
SFX H яв ювавши .
SFX H ст зму .
SFX H ови а .
SFX H иню ах .
SFX H иня ам .
SFX H ячись итимусь .
SFX H ячися итимусь .
SFX H ов івці .
SFX H ід оду .
SFX H тав чемо .
SFX H ер ами .
SFX H єць йського .
SFX H ери ами .
SFX H нись авшися .
SFX H нися авшися .
SFX H ук енко .
SFX H ливо ному .
SFX H юк івкою .
SFX H ір оре .
SFX H ачи итимемо .
SFX H учи емо .
SFX H тв ькій .
SFX H тя ній .
SFX H з тичній .
SFX H ово ам .
SFX H ін и .
SFX H шав ймо .
SFX H зми стові .
SFX H рю 0 .
SFX H ттю ванням .
SFX H їм ять .
SFX H 'ю ному .
SFX H ат у .
SFX H ди сти .
SFX H ар ового .
SFX H ги жному .
SFX H ря х .
SFX H 'я нім .
SFX H як ою .
SFX H г жному .
SFX H ищ ами .
SFX H си ли .
SFX H хи ні .
SFX H он 0 .
SFX H ан 0 .
SFX H кав ніть .
SFX H ель лі .
SFX H іт отом .
SFX H л те .
SFX H хо ну .
SFX H ен на .
SFX H с ні .
SFX H дю е .
SFX H ак и .
SFX H дав ло .
SFX H зав жем .
SFX H еля и .
SFX H їн я .
SFX H еня у .
SFX H ік ика .
SFX H ун а .
SFX H ьню а .
SFX H енят у .
SFX H ури 0 .
SFX H ет 0 .

SFX I Y 1
SFX I 0 й .

SFX J Y 139
SFX J му го .
SFX J ім ого .
SFX J им ого .
SFX J і ою .
SFX J ю му .
SFX J е ими .
SFX J а ому .
SFX J й ми .
SFX J ої ій .
SFX J их ій .
SFX J ими ій .
SFX J го ю .
SFX J ам и .
SFX J я ю .
SFX J ом 0 .
SFX J ах ові .
SFX J ами ові .
SFX J мо тесь .
SFX J ів ом .
SFX J мось ться .
SFX J тесь мо .
SFX J ям і .
SFX J ти ла .
SFX J вши ти .
SFX J ть ла .
SFX J ш ться .
SFX J ли в .
SFX J ем уть .
SFX J єм ймо .
SFX J є ймо .
SFX J ло тимуть .
SFX J тись лось .
SFX J лось тись .
SFX J ась ось .
SFX J лись тись .
SFX J всь лись .
SFX J вшись лись .
SFX J ку ці .
SFX J усь емося .
SFX J вав ймо .
SFX J юсь єтесь .
SFX J йсь ємось .
SFX J ючи йте .
SFX J ок ки .
SFX J ну 0 .
SFX J ючись йтесь .
SFX J ях е .
SFX J ями е .
SFX J но ли .
SFX J ву м .
SFX J ки ами .
SFX J ко і .
SFX J нь вши .
SFX J чу ть .
SFX J ик е .
SFX J ії а .
SFX J ець ці .
SFX J шу сть .
SFX J ив еному .
SFX J иць ім .
SFX J тво ькім .
SFX J ув ем .
SFX J ч тимемо .
SFX J ту ли .
SFX J їв ях .
SFX J ин і .
SFX J тору цією .
SFX J ни атимуть .
SFX J зм стові .
SFX J лу ти .
SFX J іми ьої .
SFX J іх ьої .
SFX J тор ція .
SFX J тори цію .
SFX J ячи итимете .
SFX J гу зі .
SFX J то вшись .
SFX J яв юватиме .
SFX J ст зме .
SFX J жу ять .
SFX J ху сі .
SFX J ячись итимуся .
SFX J ови івкою .
SFX J ов і .
SFX J еру ові .
SFX J су 0 .
SFX J ід одами .
SFX J тав чете .
SFX J єць йському .
SFX J ер ом .
SFX J оду ід .
SFX J щу стим .
SFX J ук енку .
SFX J нись аймось .
SFX J ери і .
SFX J юк у .
SFX J ір ору .
SFX J ливо ним .
SFX J ачи итимете .
SFX J тв ькім .
SFX J учи іть .
SFX J зу тичними .
SFX J з тичнім .
SFX J ово и .
SFX J шав ють .
SFX J ін ові .
SFX J їм юватиме .
SFX J ат увавши .
SFX J зми стів .
SFX J ди ли .
SFX J ар овому .
SFX J 'ї ному .
SFX J ги жними .
SFX J як икові .
SFX J щ ськом .
SFX J г жній .
SFX J си шеними .
SFX J хи шками .
SFX J он а .
SFX J кав немо .
SFX J ель и .
SFX J іт у .
SFX J ан ові .
SFX J хо не .
SFX J с шу .
SFX J уру ові .
SFX J дав ли .
SFX J зав жеш .
SFX J їн є .
SFX J ен но .
SFX J ак е .
SFX J л в .
SFX J ун ом .
SFX J ік ик .
SFX J нят 0 .
SFX J оїду у .
SFX J ару у .
SFX J бу 0 .
SFX J пу 0 .
